Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1077.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1556XC (5) 91 jda/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 69. In consultation with the Iowa 3 county attorneys association, develop and distribute to 4 county attorneys, school districts, and accredited nonpublic 5 schools a model policy that county attorneys may reference 6 when determining whether and to what extent to enforce the 7 provisions of chapter 299. 8 Sec. 2. Section 299.1, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 2025, 9 is amended by adding the following new subparagraphs: 10 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (7) Who is a military applicant 11 undergoing military entrance processing. 12 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (8) Who is engaged in military service. 13 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (9) Who is traveling to attend a funeral. 14 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (10) Who is traveling to attend a 15 wedding. 16 Sec. 3. Section 299.1, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 17 by adding the following new paragraph: 18 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. The policy or rules adopted by the board 19 of directors of a public school district pursuant to paragraph 20 âaâ must describe how the exceptions described in paragraph âbâ 21 may be met by a child and must give reasonable consideration 22 to travel time. 23 Sec. 4. Section 299.12, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 24 2025, is amended to read as follows: 25 a. When a child becomes chronically absent, a school 26 official shall send a notice by ordinary mail or electronic 27 mail to the county attorney of the county in which the public 28 schoolâs central administrative office is located, and a 29 notice by certified mail to the childâs parent, guardian, or 30 legal or actual custodian of the child, if the child is not 31 an emancipated minor, or to the child, if the child is an 32 emancipated minor, that includes information related to the 33 childâs absences from school and the policies and disciplinary 34 processes associated with additional absences. The notice 35 -1- LSB 1556XC (5) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 S.F. _____ the school official sends to the childâs parent, guardian, 1 or legal or actual custodian of the child, if the child is 2 not an emancipated minor, or to the child, if the child is an 3 emancipated minor, may be sent by ordinary mail, electronic 4 mail, or electronic message, or may be delivered in person. 5 The school shall maintain a copy of the notice until the child 6 graduates, turns twenty-one years of age, or is no longer 7 enrolled in the school, whichever occurs first. 8 Sec. 5. Section 299.12, subsection 3, paragraph a, 9 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 10 (1) If a child is absent from school for greater than or 11 equal to fifteen percent of the days or hours in the grading 12 period, a school official shall attempt to find the cause for 13 the childâs absences and . If the school official determines 14 that the childâs absences are negatively affecting the childâs 15 academic progress, the school official shall initiate and 16 participate in a school engagement meeting. The purpose of the 17 school engagement meeting is to identify the childâs barriers 18 to attendance and the interventions that may be used to improve 19 the childâs attendance. 20